apertium-dan-nor.nno.dix
<pardef n="b/e__vblex_adj">
<!-- todo collapse with b/ede? -->
<e>       <p><l>eden</l>   <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edd</l>   <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>eden</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edd</l>   <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ede</l>   <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edi</l>   <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edt</l>   <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edde</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>edne</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edde</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>edne</l>  <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>edande</l><r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>e</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>edast</l> <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edd</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ede</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edi</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edt</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ad</l>    <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="b/ede__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>eden</l>   <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edd</l>   <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>eden</l>  <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edd</l>   <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ede</l>   <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edi</l>   <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edt</l>   <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edde</l>  <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>edne</l>  <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edde</l>  <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>edne</l>  <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>edande</l><r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>ed</l>    <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ed</l><r>ede</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>edast</l> <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edd</l>   <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ede</l>   <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edi</l>   <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>edt</l>   <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ed</l>    <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ad</l>    <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kv/elle__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>ollen</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ollen</l> <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>olle</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>olli</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>olne</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>olne</l>  <r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ellande</l><r>elle<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>ell</l>   <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ell</l><r>elle</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ellast</l><r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>olle</l>  <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>olli</l>  <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ell</l>   <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>all</l>   <r>elle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/yke__vblex_adj">
<e>       <p><l>oken</l>   <r>yke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oken</l>  <r>yke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oke</l>   <r>yke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oki</l>   <r>yke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>okne</l>  <r>yke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>okne</l>  <r>yke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ykande</l><r>yke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

<e>       <p><l>yk</l>    <r>yke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>yk</l><r>yke</r></p><par n="a_vs_e__vblex_inf"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ykast</l> <r>yke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>oke</l>   <r>yke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>oki</l>   <r>yke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>yk</l>    <r>yke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>auk</l>   <r>yke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="be">              <i>b</i><par n="b/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="fyke"><i>f</i><par n="f/yke__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="gnelle"><i>gn</i><par n="kv/elle__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="kakstryke"><i>kakstr</i><par n="f/yke__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="nibe"><i>nib</i><par n="b/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="stryke"><i>str</i><par n="f/yke__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="svelle"><i>sv</i><par n="kv/elle__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="tilbe"><i>tilb</i><par n="b/e__vblex_adj"/></e>
